dix/not-common-apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
    <pardef n="ser__vb">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itan</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itajn</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>onta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>intaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="i__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itan</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itajn</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>onta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>intaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>itaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelono__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelon/o__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelona__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="United_States__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Marko__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mark/o__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Maria__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mark__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mary__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="CX__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="one__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="Esperanto">
        <i>Esperant</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Zamenhof">
        <i>Zamenhof</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Satano">
        <i>Satan</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Herkulo">
        <i>Herkul</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Kristo">
        <i>Krist</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Minorko">
        <i>Minork</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Ĝermanio">
        <i>Ĝermani</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Dalmatio">
        <i>Dalmati</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="America">
        <i>America</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Atlaso">
        <i>Atlas</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Australia">
        <i>Australia</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Brazil">
        <i>Brazil</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Crete">
        <i>Crete</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Slovakia">
        <i>Slovakia</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Georgia">
        <i>Georgia</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Ĝenevo">
        <i>Ĝenev</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Hindio">
        <i>Hindi</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Italy">
        <i>Italy</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Liechtenstein">
        <i>Liechtenstein</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Malaysia">
        <i>Malaysia</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Navarra">
        <i>Navarra</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Persia">
        <i>Persia</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Zaragozo">
        <i>Zaragoz</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Serbia">
        <i>Serbia</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Tunis">
        <i>Tunis</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Vienna">
        <i>Vienna</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Cipro">
        <i>Cipr</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Bohemio">
        <i>Bohemi</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Danio">
        <i>Dani</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Sofia">
        <i>Sofia</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Finnlando">
        <i>Finnland</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Finnlando">
        <i>Finnland</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Sofia">
        <i>Sofia</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Balkanoj">
        <i>Balkanoj</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Borneo">
        <i>Borne</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Marŝaloj">
        <i>Marŝaloj</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Papuo-Nov-Gvineo">
        <i>Papuo-Nov-Gvine</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="aspergi">
        <i>asperg</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="celumi">
        <i>celum</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="diafragmi">
        <i>diafragm</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ekspastriĝi">
        <i>ekspastriĝ</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="engaĝi">
        <i>engaĝ</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="feri">
        <i>fer</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fulmi">
        <i>fulm</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="hidri">
        <i>hidr</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="korodi">
        <i>korod</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mapi">
        <i>map</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="perdiĝi">
        <i>perdiĝ</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="renkontiĝi">
        <i>renkontiĝ</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="speguli">
        <i>spegul</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="triki">
        <i>trik</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
